New Jersey, session 222, A4699.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Every hospital service corporation contract that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1938, c.366 (C.17:48-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any named subscriber or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all hospital service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 2.    a.  Every medical service corporation contract that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1940, c.74 (C.17:48A-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any named subscriber or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all medical service corporation contracts in which the medical service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 3.    a.  Every health service corporation contract that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1985, c.236 (C.17:48E-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any named subscriber or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all health service corporation contracts in which the health service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 4.    a.  Every individual policy that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:26-1 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any named insured or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the policy. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 5.    a.  Every group policy that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:27-26 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any named insured or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the policy. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 6.    a.  Every individual health benefits plan that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the health benefits plan. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 7.    a.  Every small employer health benefits plan that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide benefits to any person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the health benefits plan. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 8.    a.  Every enrollee agreement that provides hospital or medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide health care services to any enrollee or other person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The health care services shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the enrollee agreement. c.     The provisions of this section shall apply to all enrollee agreements in which the health maintenance organization has reserved the right to change the schedule of charges. d.    As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 9.    a.  The State Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act, that provides hospital or medical expense benefits, shall provide benefits to any person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 10.  a.  The School Employees Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act that provides hospital or medical expense benefits shall provide benefits to any person covered thereunder for expenses incurred in conducting a genetic test after diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     As used in this section, genetic test means a medical test to analyze an individuals deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, chromosomes, or proteins to identify genetic changes or mutations associated with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and other cancers and to guide monitoring, treatment decisions, and appropriate management for individuals diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.  Genetic testing shall include but not be limited to germline testing and tumor molecular profiling. 11.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment and shall apply to policies and contracts that are delivered, issued, executed, or renewed on or after that date.